Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4913.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2004. (1) In order An individual shall meet all of the following to be licensed as an architect: , an individual must meet all of the following: (a) Provide evidence of completion of a first professional degree or further degree in architecture satisfactory to the board of architects or the equivalent of a first professional degree, as determined by the board of architects. (b) Pass an examination that tests the applicant's qualifications to practice architecture or provide equivalent proof of qualification acceptable to the department and the board of architects. (c) Be of good moral character. (d) Provide documentation of professional experience in architectural work satisfactory to the board. (2) In order An individual shall meet all of the following to be licensed as a professional engineer: , an individual must meet all of the following: (a) Provide documentation of at least not less than 8 years of professional experience in engineering work acceptable to the board of professional engineers, including not more than 5 years of education. (b) Provide evidence of completion of a baccalaureate degree in engineering from an accredited program or its the equivalent of a baccalaureate degree, as determined by the board of professional engineers. (c) Pass the engineering fundamentals and professional practice examinations or provide equivalent proof of qualification to practice professional engineering acceptable to the department and the board. (d) Be of good moral character. (3) In order An individual shall meet all of the following to be licensed as a professional surveyor: , an individual must meet all of the following: (a) Provide documentation of at least not less than 8 years of professional experience in professional surveying satisfactory to the board of professional surveyors, including not more than 5 years of education. (b) Provide evidence of completion of a degree in professional surveying or a related degree that included professional surveying courses acceptable to the board of professional surveyors. (c) Pass the professional surveying fundamentals and professional practice examinations or provide equivalent proof of qualification to practice professional surveying acceptable to the department and the board. (d) Be of good moral character.